Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5620.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that young people in foster care will benefit from having a statutory declaration and notification of certain rights. The statutory rights in this section are not intended to limit or supersede other rights afforded to children and youth in foster care. The legislature intends to improve the health, well-being, and safety of children and youth in foster care by declaring these rights.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:(1) Youth that are placed in out-of-home care subject to a dependency proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW have the following rights:(a) The right to be treated equally regardless of actual or perceived race, ethnicity, heritage, national origin, disability, medical problems, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, and gender expression, as well as freedom from discrimination in accordance with applicable state laws;(b) Priority placement with a relative or suitable person with whom the child or youth has a relationship and feels comfortable;(c) Placement with a foster care provider, where necessary, who has been provided with relevant case information about the child or youth's unique history as it relates to the child or youth's care needs and who has met training requirements to provide for those needs;(d) Placement or visitation with siblings;(e) A determination whether an out-of-home placement can meet the child or youth's needs or if placement in another available placement setting best meets their needs in the least restrictive environment;(f) Reasonable connections to the child's or youth's community and supports, including communication and contact with people outside the foster care system who are important to the child or youth, unless otherwise limited by law or court order;(g) To not be deprived of the opportunity to receive a basic education due to out-of-home placement resulting from a dependency proceeding;(h) Legal representation as described in RCW 13.34.090(1) and 13.34.212, as well as attendance of court hearings;(i) To consent to their adoption or guardianship if over age 14;(j) To report abuse, neglect, exploitation, or violation of these rights without retaliation;(k) To consent to behavioral and health care treatment and services as otherwise allowed by state law;(l) Personal belongings including wearing the child's or youth's own clothing, having a safe place to store personal belongings, and having personal belongings transported in appropriate luggage with the child or youth during or shortly after a change of placement;(m) Freedom from unreasonable searches and seizures of personal belongings;(n) Confidentiality regarding case file and personal information as well as access and review of personal case records;(o) To enter into extended foster care upon turning age 18 and up to age 21; and(p) When 18 or older and leaving foster care, being provided with the youth's birth certificate, social security card, immigration documents, health insurance information, medical records, case records, education records, either a driver's license or a state-issued identicard, written information including the youth's family history and contact information for siblings, if appropriate, and proof of foster care.(2) By September 1, 2025, the department shall update and make available to department staff a pamphlet containing the rights afforded to youth in foster care and the responsibilities of the department. At a minimum, the pamphlet must:(a) Be concise, but provide references to resources and services available to children and youth in care;(b) At a minimum, describe the rights as articulated under this chapter as well as any other relevant information; and(c) Provide information on how to contact caseworkers in an emergency.(3) The pamphlet required under this section must be made available by the department to all foster youth as they enter care, move placements, transition to extended foster care, and shall also be published on the department's website.--- END ---